DI-228

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLESTABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &

BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6XB-03

DTC C1210/36 Zero Point Calibration of Yaw Rate
Sensor Undone
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

When any of following 1. through 2. is detected:

1. After battery terminal was connected, when the shift
lever was moved otherthanto P range within 15 sec. *Yawrate sensor

C1210/36 soon after ECU terminal IG1 become ON forthefirst  Yawrate sensor circuit

time. « Neutral start switch circuit (P range)

2. When the yaw rate sensor zero point recorded in ECU is
deleted.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-229
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check whether zero point calibration of yaw rate sensor has been done or not.

PREPARATION:

Shift the shift lever in P range and turn the ignition switch ON, repeat connecting and releasing Ts and E
terminals of check connector 4 times or more for 8 sec. After that do not move the vehicle for 15 sec. or more.
CHECK:

Check that the”VSC TRC” warning light and "VSC OFF” indicator light up for 15 sec.

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between neutral start
switch (P range) and skid control ECU and engine and ECT ECU (See page
IN-38).

@

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between yaw rate
sensor and skid control ECU (See page IN-38).

@

4 | Check yaw rate sensor (See page DI-244).

@

Check and replace skid control ECU.
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YES> No problem.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG> Replace yaw rate sensor.




